Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-823
Department of Roads; gasohol; storage and dispensing facilities.

The department shall provide storage and dispensing facilities at various sites in the state which will make gasohol reasonably accessible to all department vehicles equipped for its use.

Laws 1979, LB 74, § 3.